Arkansas, session 2025, HB1694.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-6-230 is amended to read as follows:
7-6-230. Alternative to electronic Electronic filing of reports.
(a)(1) A candidate required to file campaign contribution and
expenditure reports in electronic form under § 7-6-207 may file reports in
paper form under this section.
(2)(A) A candidate filing reports in paper form under
subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall submit with his or her first paper
report in an election cycle a notarized affidavit on a form prepared by the
Secretary of State.
(B) The Secretary of State shall:
(i) Not accept a report in paper form under
subdivision (a)(1) of this section if a notarized affidavit was not submitted
with the first paper report in the election cycle;
(ii) Provide written notice to the candidate within
five (5) business days if the report in paper form was not filed or accepted;
and
*SSS216*
04-07-2025 11:10:59 SSS216

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 HB1694
(iii) Provide the reason the report in paper form
was not filed or accepted.
(C)(a) The Secretary of State shall develop electronic
reporting forms for campaign contribution and expenditure reports required
under § 7-6-207, including without limitation:
(i)(1) A cover sheet for a reporting period;
(ii)(2) Campaign contribution reports; and
(iii)(3) Campaign expenditure reports.
(D)(b) The Secretary of State shall develop electronic
reporting forms in a manner that allows a candidate to:
(i)(1) Fill out an electronic form for each
reporting period in an electronic word processing file, portable document
format, or equivalent format that may be saved in a read-only format;
(ii)(2) Upload the electronic reporting forms
electronically by an upload to the internet or delivered by electronic media
to the Secretary of State; and
(iii)(3) Combine all electronic forms into a single
document that is available to the public in an electronically searchable
format.
(c)(1) In the event of an emergency, the Secretary of State shall
allow a candidate to email, fax, or deliver a paper copy of his or her
campaign contribution and expenditure report to meet the deadline
requirements under § 7-6-207.
(2) A candidate submitting a paper copy of a campaign
contribution and expenditure report under subdivision (c)(1) of this section
shall upload the report electronically to the Secretary of State within ten
(10) days of submitting the paper copy.
(b)(1) The Secretary of State shall make available to candidates
wishing to file reports in paper form under this section:
(A) Information on the deadlines for filing required
reports; and
(B)(i) Appropriate forms and instructions for complying
with the deadlines.
(ii) The Arkansas Ethics Commission shall approve
the forms and instructions used by the Secretary of State to ensure that all
required information is requested.
04-07-2025 11:10:59 SSS216

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 HB1694
(2) Reports shall be filed on the forms furnished by the
Secretary of State, except that computer-generated contribution and
expenditure reports shall be accepted by the Secretary of State and the
commission provided that all of the requisite elements are included.
(c)(1)(A) A report submitted in paper form under this section other
than a preelection report is timely filed if it is either hand delivered or
mailed to the Secretary of State, properly addressed, and postage prepaid,
bearing a postmark indicating that it was received by the post office or
common carrier on the date that the report is due.
(B) A preelection report submitted in paper form under
this section is timely filed if it is received by the Secretary of State no
later than seven (7) days before the election for which it is filed.
(2) The Secretary of State shall accept a report via facsimile,
provided the original is received by the Secretary of State within ten (10)
days of the date of facsimile transmission.
(d)(1) The Secretary of State shall make available campaign
contribution and expenditure reports submitted in paper form, carryover fund
reports submitted in paper form, and affidavits accompanying reports filed in
paper form, on a portion of the official website of the Secretary of State.
(2) The Secretary of State shall comply with the requirements of
§ 7-6-214(c) regarding the “paper filer” designation and publication
requirements for all reports submitted in paper form.

/s/Hawk












04-07-2025 11:10:59 SSS216